Washington statutes.
RCW 41.16.110

Payment on death of eligible pensioner before retirement.

Whenever any firefighter shall die while eligible to retirement on account of years of service, and shall not have been retired, benefits shall be paid in accordance with RCW 41.16.100.

[ 2007 c 218 s 26; 1959 c 5 s 5; 1957 c 82 s 5. Prior: 1947 c 91 s 8, part; 1935 c 39 s 2, part; 1929 c 86 s 2, part; 1919 c 196 s 4, part; 1909 c 50 s 4, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 9578-47, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Finding—2007 c 218: See note following RCW 41.08.020.